Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 6. State Forests.

Sec. 41.17.400.
Tanana Valley State Forest.

Subject to valid existing rights and except for land owned by or transferred to the University of Alaska under a settlement agreement between the state and the university, the state-owned or acquired land and water lying within the parcels described in (d) of this section is designated as the Tanana Valley State Forest.

The commissioner shall prepare a management plan for the Tanana Valley State Forest under AS

41.17.230

.

The commissioner may establish transportation corridors within the Tanana Valley State Forest.

The Tanana Valley State Forest includes the state-owned or acquired land and water lying within the following described parcels:

Township 1 North, Range 2 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 3 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 4 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian;

Township 1 North, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 8 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 9 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 10 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 12 West, Fairbanks Meridian;

Township 1 North, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 2 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 3 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 3 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 10 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 12 West, Fairbanks Meridian;

Township 2 North, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 14 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 2 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 3 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 4 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 10 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 12 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 14 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 4 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 4 North, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 4 North, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 4 North, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 5 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 6 North, Range 4 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 6 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 7 North, Range 4 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 7 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 15 North, Range 11 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 16 North, Range 11 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 16 North, Range 12 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 11 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 12 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 18 North, Range 11 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 18 North, Range 13 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 8 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 9 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 12 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 13 East, Copper River Meridian, excluding Sections 30 — 32;

Township 19 North, Range 14 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 19 North, Range 15 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 8 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 9 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 20 North, Range 10 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 20 North, Range 11 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 12 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 13 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 21 North, Range 8 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 21 North, Range 9 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 21 North, Range 10 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 22 North, Range 5 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 22 North, Range 8 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 22 North, Range 9 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 23 North, Range 5 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 23 North, Range 6 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 23 North, Range 7 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 23 North, Range 8 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 24 North, Range 5 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 24 North, Range 6 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 24 North, Range 7 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 25 North, Range 6 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 25 North, Range 7 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 25 North, Range 8 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 26 North, Range 5 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 26 North, Range 6 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 1 South, Range 3 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 3 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 4 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 8 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 10 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 12 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 3 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 4 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 12 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 South, Range 3 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 South, Range 4 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 South, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 South, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 South, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 South, Range 12 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 South, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 4 South, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 4 South, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 4 South, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 4 South, Range 13 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 5 South, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 5 South, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 5 South, Range 6 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 5 South, Range 8 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 5 South, Range 9 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 6 South, Range 4 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 6 South, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 6 South, Range 6 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 6 South, Range 7 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 6 South, Range 8 East, Fairbanks Meridian;

Township 6 South, Range 9 East, Fairbanks Meridian;

Township 6 South, Range 10 East, Fairbanks Meridian;

Township 7 South, Range 6 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 7 South, Range 7 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 7 South, Range 8 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 7 South, Range 9 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 7 South, Range 10 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 7 South, Range 11 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 7 South, Range 12 East, Fairbanks Meridian;

Township 8 South, Range 5 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 8 South, Range 6 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 8 South, Range 7 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 8 South, Range 8 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 8 South, Range 10 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 8 South, Range 11 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 8 South, Range 12 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 8 South, Range 13 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 9 South, Range 11 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 9 South, Range 12 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 9 South, Range 13 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 9 South, Range 14 East, Fairbanks Meridian;

Township 9 South, Range 16 East, Fairbanks Meridian;

Township 10 South, Range 12 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 10 South, Range 13 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 10 South, Range 14 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 10 South, Range 16 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 11 South, Range 14 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 11 South, Range 16 East, Fairbanks Meridian;

Township 12 South, Range 14 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 12 South, Range 15 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 12 South, Range 16 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 13 South, Range 15 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 13 South, Range 16 East, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 14 South, Range 16 East, Fairbanks Meridian

The wildlife management objective of the Tanana Valley State Forest is the production of wildlife for a high level of sustained yield for human use through habitat improvement techniques to the extent consistent with the primary purpose of a state forest under AS

41.17.200

.

Sections 1 — 3

Sections 10 — 12

Sections 13 — 15: N1/2;

Section 1: E1/2, E1/2SW1/4, SW1/4SW1/4, SE1/4NW1/4

Section 2: NW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4

Sections 3 — 5

Section 6: N1/2

Section 7: E1/2E1/2

Sections 8 — 9

Section 10: NW1/4SW1/4, N1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4

Section 11: E1/2, S1/2SW1/4

Sections 12 — 14

Section 15: S1/2NE1/4, NE1/4NE1/4, S1/2;

Sections 1 — 12

Sections 16 — 18;

Sections 6 — 10

Sections 15 — 16;

Section 5: W1/2

Sections 6 — 11

Section 15

Sections 16 — 24

Section 27

Section 28: NE1/4, NE1/4SE1/4

Section 29: S1/2, W1/2NW1/4

Sections 30 — 32

Section 33: W1/2;

Section 1

Sections 12 — 13

Sections 24 — 25

Sections 35 — 36;

Sections 17 — 20

Sections 29 — 34

Section 35: W1/2;

Sections 13 — 36;

Sections 13 — 36;

Sections 5 — 7

Section 18: west of Tolovana River

Section 19: west of Tolovana River

Section 30: west of Tolovana River

Sections 31 — 36;

Sections 1 — 3

Sections 10 — 15

Sections 22 — 26

Sections 35 — 36;

Sections 34 — 36;

Sections 13 — 16

Sections 21 — 29

Sections 31 — 36;

Sections 5 — 8

Sections 17 — 19

Section 30: N1/2;

Section 11: S1/2

Section 12: S1/2

Sections 13 — 17

Sections 19 — 24;

Section 1

Section 2: N1/2

Section 3: N1/2

Sections 4 — 8

Section 9: N1/2

Section 11: S1/2

Sections 12 — 14

Section 15: S1/2

Section 17: N1/2

Sections 18 — 19

Sections 21 — 36;

Sections 4 — 6

Section 7: N1/2;

Sections 1 — 9

Section 10: N1/2

Section 11: N1/2

Section 12: N1/2

Sections 16 — 21

Sections 28 — 33;

Sections 1 — 30

Sections 33 — 36;

Sections 23 — 26;

Section 7: Tract E, ASLS 81-20

Section 8: Tracts H, J, K, L, ASLS 81-20

Section 17: Tracts M, N, O, ASLS 81-20

Section 18: Tracts A, B, ASLS 81-20

Section 19;

Section 13

Sections 19 — 24

Section 25: N1/2

Section 31: N1/2, SW1/4

Section 32: N1/2

Section 33: N1/2

Section 34: N1/2

Section 35: N1/2;

Section 3: west of Washington Creek

Sections 4 — 7

Section 8: west of Washington Creek

Section 9: west of Washington Creek

Section 10: west of Washington Creek

Section 17: west of Washington Creek

Sections 18 — 36;

Section 1

Section 4: north of left limit of Tatalina River

Section 5: north of left limit of Tatalina River

Sections 6 — 7

Sections 11 — 36;

Sections 1 — 12;

Sections 1 — 3

Sections 10 — 12;

Sections 1 — 10

Sections 15 — 33;

Sections 1 — 3

Sections 10 — 15

Sections 19 — 36;

Section 19: east of right limit of Hutlitakwa Creek

Section 20: east of right limit of Hutlitakwa Creek

Section 21: east of right limit of Hutlitakwa Creek

Sections 22 — 29

Section 30: east of right limit of Hutlitakwa Creek

Sections 31 — 36;

Sections 3 — 4

Section 9

Sections 16 — 17

Sections 19 — 20

Section 21: W1/2

Section 25: east of right limit of Hutlitakwa Creek

Section 26: east of right limit of Hutlitakwa Creek

Sections 29 — 32

Section 34: east of right limit of Hutlitakwa Creek

Section 35: east of right limit of Hutlitakwa Creek

Section 36;

Section 25: E1/2

Section 36;

Section 1: west of left limit of Tatalina River

Sections 2 — 10

Section 11: west of left limit of Tatalina River

Section 12: west of left limit of Tatalina River

Section 14: west of left limit of Tatalina River

Section 15: west of left limit of Tatalina River

Sections 16 — 21

Section 22: west of left limit of Tatalina River

Section 27: west of left limit of Tatalina River

Section 28: west of left limit of Tatalina River

Sections 29 — 32

Section 33: west of left limit of Tatalina River;

Section 1

Sections 10 — 15

Sections 22 — 36;

Sections 25 — 26

Section 32: SE 1/4

Sections 33 — 36;

Section 27

Section 33: SE1/4

Section 34;

Sections 1 — 2: west of Slate Creek

Sections 3 — 5

Section 6: E1/2

Section 7: E1/2

Sections 8 — 11

Section 12: west of Slate Creek

Sections 13 — 17

Section 18: E1/2

Sections 19 — 36;

Section 5: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way and north of left limit of Slate Creek

Section 6: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way

Section 7: west of left limit of Slate Creek

Section 8: west of left limit of Slate Creek

Section 18: west of left limit of Slate Creek

Section 19: west of left limit of Slate Creek;

Sections 1 — 4

Section 5: E1/2

Section 8: E1/2

Sections 9 — 16

Section 17: E1/2

Sections 20 — 23

Section 24: west of left limit of Slate Creek

Section 25: west of left limit of Slate Creek

Section 26: west of left limit of Slate Creek

Sections 27 — 29

Sections 32 — 34

Section 35: west of left limit of Slate Creek;

Section 30: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way

Section 31: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way;

Section 15: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way

Section 16: E1/2

Section 21: E1/2

Section 22: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way

Section 23: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way

Section 25: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way

Section 26: west of Alyeska Pipeline right-of-way

Section 27

Section 28: E1/2

Section 33: E1/2

Sections 34 — 36;

Sections 1 — 2

Section 3: excluding ASLS 78-42

Sections 4 — 8

Sections 17 — 19

Section 30

Section 31;

Sections 1 — 3

Sections 10 — 15

Sections 22 — 36;

Sections 1 — 12

Sections 14 — 22

Sections 28 — 32;

Sections 1 — 3

Sections 10 — 15;

Section 5: west of Eagle Trail

Section 6: west of Eagle Trail

Sections 7 — 8

Section 9: west of Eagle Trail

Section 15: west of Eagle Trail

Section 16: west of Eagle Trail

Sections 17 — 21

Section 22: west of Eagle Trail

Section 23: west of Eagle Trail

Section 26: west of Eagle Trail

Sections 27 — 34

Section 35: west of Eagle Trail;

Section 26: west of Eagle Trail

Sections 27 — 33

Section 34: west of Eagle Trail

Section 35: west of Eagle Trail

Section 36: west of Eagle Trail;

Sections 4 — 5;

Section 1: east of left limit of Tanana River

Section 2: east of left limit of Tanana River

Section 12: east of left limit of Tanana River

Section 13: east of left limit of Tanana River

Section 24: east of left limit of Tanana River

Section 25: east of left limit of Tanana River;

Sections 1 — 21

Section 22: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 23: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 24: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 25: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 28: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 29: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 30: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 31: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 32: north of left limit of Tanana River;

Sections 1 — 3

Section 10

Section 11: excluding F14438 Parcel B

Section 12

Section 13: excluding F14471 Parcel B

Sections 14 — 15

Section 16: E1/2

Section 17: S1/2

Section 19

Section 20: excluding USS6011 F024775 Parcel E

Sections 21 — 36;

Sections 16 — 36;

Sections 1 — 2

Section 3: east of Alaska Highway

Section 10: east of Alaska Highway

Sections 11 — 13

Section 14: east of Alaska Highway

Section 23: east of Alaska Highway

Sections 24 — 25

Section 26: east of Alaska Highway

Section 35: east of Alaska Highway

Section 36;

Sections 1 — 16

Section 17

Section 18

Sections 20 — 23

Sections 28 — 29

Section 32

Section 33: excluding USS 4377, NA Parcel A, F12549, NA, Parcels B, F-14422;

Sections 20 — 23

Section 24: excluding NA, F-12107

Sections 25 — 29

Sections 34 — 36;

Sections 19 — 36;

Sections 1 — 6

Sections 8 — 17

Sections 21 — 25

Sections 26 — 27: excluding USS 3620

Section 34: excluding USS 5622A

Section 36;

Sections 23 — 26

Sections 35 — 36;

Sections 1 — 12

Section 13: north of Alaska Highway

Section 14: north of Alaska Highway

Section 15: north of Alaska Highway

Section 16: north of Alaska Highway

Section 17: north of Alaska Highway

Section 18: north of Alaska Highway;

Sections 1 — 3

Sections 10 — 15

Sections 21 — 24;

Sections 2 — 7

Section 13

Sections 18 — 19

Sections 24 — 25;

Sections 1 — 30

Section 34: NE1/4, S1/2

Sections 35 — 36;

Sections 1 — 5

Sections 8 — 17

Sections 20 — 29

Sections 34 — 36;

Sections 6 — 7

Sections 18 — 19

Sections 31 — 32;

Section 1

Sections 11 — 14

Section 15: S1/2, S1/2N1/2

Section 16

Section 23: NE1/4

Section 24: N1/2;

Sections 1 — 2

Section 4: S1/2

Section 5: S1/2, NW1/4

Sections 6 — 7

Section 8: north of Chena River

Section 9: the NW1/4 north of Chena River, N1/2NE1/4

Section 10: NE1/4

Section 11

Section 12: N1/2

Section 17: north of Chena River

Section 18;

Section 6;

Section 26: S1/2 south of Parks Highway

Section 27: south of Parks Highway

Section 28: south of Parks Highway

Section 29: west of Old Nenana Highway and south of Parks Highway

Section 31: south of Parks Highway

Section 32: south of Parks Highway

Section 33: south of Parks Highway

Section 34: south of Parks Highway

Section 35;

Section 4: SW1/4

Sections 7 — 8

Section 9: NW1/4

Section 18: N1/2

Section 23: SE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4

Sections 24 — 29

Section 32: N1/2N1/2

Section 34: excluding NW1/4NW1/4

Sections 35 — 36;

Sections 2 — 12

Section 13: N1/2

Sections 14 — 23

Sections 28 — 30

Section 31: N1/2, N1/2S1/2

Section 32: N1/2, N1/2S1/2;

Sections 1 — 4

Sections 9 — 16

Sections 21 — 28

Sections 32 — 34

Section 35: E1/2

Section 36: N1/2;

Sections 3 — 10

Sections 15 — 22

Sections 27 — 34;

Sections 1 — 6;

Sections 1 — 24

Sections 27 — 34;

Sections 1 — 2

Sections 11 — 14

Section 21: south of the unnamed creek

Sections 22 — 28

Section 31: south of right limit of Tanana River

Section 32: south of right limit of Tanana River

Sections 33 — 36;

Section 27: north of a branch of Tanana River

Section 34: north of a branch of Tanana River

Section 35: north of a branch of Tanana River

Section 36: north of a branch of Tanana River;

Section 2: N1/2, tract F, ASLS 80 — 118

Sections 3 — 10

Section 13: Lots A and C

Section 14: Lots 5 — 7, NE1/4, SW1/4

Section 15: west of left limit of Tanana River

Sections 16 — 19

Section 20: north of military reservation

Section 21: north of military reservation

Section 22: north of military reservation

Section 23: north of military reservation

Section 24: north of military reservation

Section 28: north of military reservation

Section 29: north of military reservation

Sections 30 — 31

Section 32: north of military reservation;

Sections 1 — 3

Section 4: E1/2, SW1/4

Section 7: SE1/4SE1/4

Section 8: S1/2NE1/4, SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4, SW1/4SW1/4, and all land south of Parks Highway

Sections 9 — 36;

Sections 1 — 2

Sections 7 — 27

Sections 31 — 36;

Section 3

Section 4: N1/2, SE1/4, SW1/4SW1/4

Section 5

Sections 10 — 12

Section 16;

Section 35: SE1/4SE1/4

Section 36: SE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4, E1/2SW1/4, SW1/4SW1/4;

Section 6;

Sections 1 — 24

Sections 27 — 34;

Sections 1 — 6

Section 7: Tracts A, B, and C, ASLS 81-54 SW1/4

Section 8: NE1/4, Tracts D, E, F, ASLS 81-54

Sections 9 — 30

Sections 33 — 36;

Section 6: north of military reservation

Section 7: north of military reservation;

Sections 1 — 11

Section 12: north of military reservation

Section 14: north of military reservation

Section 15: north of military reservation

Section 16

Section 17: north of military reservation

Section 20: north of military reservation

Section 21: north of military reservation

Section 22: north of military reservation;

Sections 1 — 12

Section 13: NW1/4NW1/4, Lots 2 — 4

Section 14: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 15: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 17: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 18: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 19: north of left limit of Tanana River, excluding NE1/4NE1/4

Section 20: north of left limit of Tanana River, excluding Lot 3

Section 21: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 31: Lot 2;

Sections 13 — 36;

Section 1

Section 2: E1/2, E1/2SW1/4, SW1/4SW1/4

Section 3: SE1/4SE1/4

Section 9: south of Parks Highway

Section 10: that portion of NE1/4 that lies south of Parks Highway, SW1/4SE1/2

Section 11: N1/2, N1/2SE1/4

Section 12: N1/2, N1/2S1/2

Section 20: S1/2

Sections 22 — 29

Sections 31 — 36;

Sections 3 — 10

Sections 15 — 19

Section 30;

Section 12: E1/2

Section 13

Section 14: E1/2

Sections 24 — 25

Section 26: E1/2

Sections 35 — 36;

Section 30: west of Richardson Highway

Section 31: west of Richardson Highway

Section 32: west of Richardson Highway;

Sections 1 — 12

Sections 14 — 18;

Sections 1 — 12

Section 13: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 14: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 18: Lots 3 — 6;

Sections 1 — 2

Section 3: east of left limit of Kantishna River

Section 4: east of left limit of Kantishna River

Section 8: east of left limit of Kantishna River

Section 9: east of left limit of Kantishna River

Section 10: east of left limit of Kantishna River

Section 11

Section 15

Section 16: east of left limit of Kantishna River

Section 17: east of left limit of Kantishna River

Section 20: east of left limit of Kantishna River

Section 21: east of left limit of Kantishna River

Section 22

Section 27: east of left limit of Kantishna River

Section 28: east of left limit of Kantishna River

Section 29: east of left limit of Kantishna River

Section 33: east of left limit of Kantishna River

Section 34: east of left limit of Kantishna River;

Sections 5 — 6

Section 7: east of military reservation

Section 8

Section 17

Section 18: east of military reservation

Section 19: east of military reservation

Section 20

Section 29

Section 30: east of military reservation

Section 31

Section 32: excluding NE1/4SE1/4, Lots 1 — 4;

Sections 25 — 29

Sections 33 — 36;

Sections 28 — 29

Section 30: S1/2

Sections 31 — 34

Section 36: S1/2;

Sections 1 — 6

Sections 8 — 17

Sections 20 — 30

Sections 32 — 36;

Sections 4 — 9

Sections 13 — 36;

Section 5: excluding Lots 1, 2

Section 6: east of military reservation

Section 7: east of military reservation

Section 8

Section 9: excluding N1/2NE1/4SE1/4, S1/2S1/2NE1/4, Lot 5

Section 14: Lot 4

Section 15: south of Tanana River

Section 16

Section 21: east of military reservation

Section 22

Section 23: NE1/4NE1/4, that portion west of Richardson Highway

Section 25: south of Richardson Highway

Section 26: excluding Lot 1

Section 27: east of military reservation

Section 35

Section 36: W1/2SW1/4;

Sections 1 — 4

Sections 9 — 15

Section 16: S1/2, NE1/4

Section 20: S1/2

Sections 21 — 28

Section 29: N1/2

Section 36;

Section 1

Sections 3 — 9

Section 10: W1/2

Section 11: E1/2

Sections 12 — 36;

Sections 3 — 36;

Sections 1 — 5

Sections 8 — 15

Sections 21 — 24

Section 25: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 26: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 27: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 28

Section 29: S1/2

Section 30: S1/2

Sections 31 — 32

Section 33: north of left limit of Tanana River;

Sections 1 — 18

Section 19: north of Richardson Highway

Section 20: north of Richardson Highway

Section 21: north of Richardson Highway

Sections 23 — 26

Section 27: north of Richardson Highway

Section 35: excluding ASLS 81-213 except Tract A

Section 36: excluding ASLS 81-213 except Tract A;

Sections 1 — 12

Sections 15 — 21

Section 22: W1/2

Section 27: W1/2

Sections 28 — 32

Section 34;

Sections 3 — 10

Section 15: N1/2

Section 16: N1/2;

Sections 24 — 25

Sections 35 — 36;

Sections 1 — 2

Sections 11 — 14

Sections 19 — 36;

Section 1: S1/2SW1/4

Section 2: S1/2 north of military reservation, S1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NE1/4

Section 3: SE1/4NE1/4, NE1/4SE1/4, north of military reservation

Section 11: north of the military reservation

Section 12: north of the military reservation

Section 13: north of the military reservation;

Section 1: S1/2SW1/4, SW1/4SE1/4

Section 2: S1/2S1/2

Section 3: S1/2S1/2

Sections 7 — 16

Section 17: north of military reservation

Section 18: north of military reservation

Section 20: north of military reservation

Section 21: north of military reservation

Sections 22 — 26

Section 27: north of military reservation

Section 28: north of military reservation;

Section 1

Section 13: W1/2, SE1/4, SW1/4NE1/4

Section 14: W1/2SW1/4, E1/2NE1/4

Section 15: S1/2, NW1/4, S1/2NE1/4

Sections 16 — 17

Section 19: SE1/4SE1/4

Sections 20 — 22

Section 23: NW1/4, N1/2SW1/4, NE1/4NE1/4, W1/2NE1/4

Section 24: N1/2 NW1/4

Section 27: W1/2, NW1/4NE1/4

Section 28: NE1/4SE 1/4, north of Delta River

Section 29

Section 30: NE1/4NE1/4

Section 34: NW1/4NW1/4;

Sections 4 — 6

Section 18: SW1/4SE1/4, S1/2SW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4

Section 19: N1/2, N1/2SE1/4

Section 20: SW1/4NW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4;

Section 1

Sections 12 — 13;

Sections 1 — 18

Sections 22 — 27

Section 36;

Sections 1 — 10

Sections 15 — 22

Sections 27 — 34;

Sections 25 — 26

Sections 33 — 36;

Section 3: S1/2

Sections 4 — 5

Sections 8 — 11

Sections 13 — 16

Section 17: E1/2, NE1/4SW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4

Sections 21 — 27

Section 28: excluding FO2662;

Sections 19 — 21

Sections 28 — 36;

Sections 1 — 3

Section 10: E1/2

Sections 11 — 13

Sections 24 — 25

Section 26: S1/2

Section 27

Section 28: NE1/4

Sections 34 — 36;

Sections 1 — 3

Section 4: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 5: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 6: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 10: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 11: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 12: north of left limit of Tanana River;

Sections 1 — 6

Section 7: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 8: north of left limit of Tanana River

Sections 9 — 12

Section 14: N1/2

Section 15: N1/2;

Sections 1 — 20

Section 21: NE1/4SE1/4, W1/2, N1/2NE1/4

Sections 22 — 24

Section 25: excluding Tract C

Section 26: excluding SW1/4SW1/4

Section 27: N1/2NE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4

Section 28: W1/2

Section 29

Section 30: NE1/4NE1/4

Section 32: excluding Tract U, Delta I

Section 33: W1/2;

Sections 1 — 35;

Section 4: NW1/4, Tracts A, B, E

Section 5: excluding Tract U, Delta Barley I

Section 9: Tracts A, B, E1/2

Section 10: Tracts B, C

Section 15: Tracts B, C

Section 16: E1/2, Tracts A, B

Section 21: Tracts A, B

Section 22: NW1/4, Tracts A, B, D

Section 23: Tracts A, B, D, E

Section 26: Tracts A, B, C, D

Section 35: E1/2, Tracts A, B

Section 36: Tracts A, B, C, D, E;

Section 1: excluding USS 4013

Section 2: excluding ASLS 79-93

Section 11: excluding ASLS 79-93

Sections 12 — 13

Section 14: excluding ASLS 79-93

Section 23: excluding ASLS 79-93

Section 24: excluding ASLS 79-93

Section 25: excluding ASLS 79-93

Section 36: excluding ASLS 79-93;

Sections 2 — 6

Section 7: excluding SE1/4SW1/4

Sections 8 — 14

Section 15: E1/2, E1/2NE1/4

Section 18: W1/2W1/2

Section 19: W1/2W1/2

Section 21: S1/2SE1/4

Section 22: excluding N1/2NW1/4

Sections 23 — 30

Section 31: SW1/4

Section 32: SE1/4, S1/2SW1/4

Sections 33 — 36;

Sections 1 — 5

Sections 9 — 16

Sections 21 — 28

Sections 34 — 36;

Sections 1 — 3

Section 4: N1/2SE1/4, NE1/4, N1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4

Section 5: Tracts A and C

Section 6: north of Alaska Highway

Section 11: Tracts D and F

Section 12

Section 13: Tracts B and C;

Section 1

Sections 6 — 7

Section 12: excluding George Lake Subdivision

Sections 16 — 18

Section 19: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 20: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 21

Section 27

Section 28: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 29: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 32: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 33: north of left limit of Tanana River

Sections 34 — 35;

Sections 1 — 3

Section 4: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 10: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 11: north of left limit of Tanana River

Section 12.

History.

(§ 3 ch 91 SLA 1983; am §§ 33, 34 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 23 ch 34 SLA 1990; am § 11 ch 122 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 153 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 65 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For land that may be selected by the Fairbanks North Star Borough for an industrial park, see § 4, ch. 91, SLA 1983, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For an analysis of the amendment to (b) and (c) of this section by secs. 33 and 34, ch. 85, SLA 1988 (HCS CSSB 413 (Jud)), see 1988 House & Senate Joint Journal Supplement No. 18, May 10, 1988, p. 7.